Maine, session 132, LD375.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. University of Maine System to establish online degree program at
the University of Maine School of Law. The University of Maine System shall
establish an online degree program at the University of Maine School of Law. By
November 4, 2026, the University of Maine System shall submit a report related to the
establishment of the online degree program to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters.